Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
General Provisions

186.005.
Policy on regulation and registration of vehicles — License plates.

It is declared to be the policy of this Commonwealth that all vehicles should be regulated, registered, and the laws pertaining thereto be administered by the Transportation Cabinet. Motor vehicles other than commercial vehicles should be registered, regulated, and controlled by the Transportation Cabinet and the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

All motor vehicles registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(1) shall be on an annual basis and evidenced by a license plate whose registration designation is a combination of letters of the alphabet and Arabic numerical digits. These registration plates shall be issued for use during a multiyear period and validated for continued use the following year, or years, by affixing an appropriate insignia of plastic or adhesive material bearing the date of the new year.

Unless otherwise specified, all motor vehicles shall have registration plates issued for use during a multiyear period and validated for continued use the following year, by affixing an appropriate insignia of plastic or adhesive material bearing the date of the new year.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate regulations and prepare the proper insignia and forms, which forms shall include information required by the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 62, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 168; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(9); 1974, ch. 226, § 1; 1976, ch. 94, § 1; 1976, ch. 133, § 3; 1978, ch. 239, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1994, ch. 132, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 189, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 53, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

186.010.
Definitions for chapter. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise indicated:

“Cabinet,” as used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, means the Transportation Cabinet; except as specifically designated, “cabinet,” as used in KRS

186.020

to

186.270

, means the Transportation Cabinet only with respect to motor vehicles, other than commercial vehicles; “cabinet,” as used in KRS

186.020

to

186.270

, means the Department of Vehicle Regulation when used with respect to commercial vehicles;

“Highway” means every way or place of whatever nature when any part of it is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, license, or privilege, for the purpose of vehicular traffic;

“Manufacturer” means any person engaged in manufacturing motor vehicles who will, under normal conditions during the year, manufacture or assemble at least ten (10) new motor vehicles;

“Motor vehicle” means in KRS

186.020

to

186.260

, all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (a) of subsection (8) of this section, which are propelled otherwise than by muscular power. As used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, it means all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of this section, which are self-propelled. “Motor vehicle” shall not include a moped as defined in this section, but for registration purposes shall include low-speed vehicles and military surplus vehicles as defined in this section and vehicles operating under KRS

189.283

;

“Moped” means either a motorized bicycle whose frame design may include one (1) or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank so long as it also has pedals, or a motorized bicycle with a step-through type frame which may or may not have pedals rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;

“Operator” means any person in actual control of a motor vehicle upon a highway;

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or a person who pursuant to a bona fide sale has received physical possession of the vehicle subject to any applicable security interest.

A vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease, with the vendee or lessee entitled to possession of the vehicle, upon performance of the contract terms, for a period of three hundred sixty-five (365) days or more and with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or if a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, the conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner.

A licensed motor vehicle dealer who transfers physical possession of a motor vehicle to a purchaser pursuant to a bona fide sale, and complies with the requirements of KRS

186A.220

, shall not be deemed the owner of that motor vehicle solely due to an assignment to his dealership or a certificate of title in the dealership’s name. Rather, under these circumstances, ownership shall transfer upon delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser, subject to any applicable security interest;

“Vehicle,” as used in KRS

186.020

to

186.260

, includes all agencies for the transportation of persons or property over or upon the public highways of this Commonwealth and all vehicles passing over or upon said highways, except electric low-speed scooters, road rollers, road graders, farm tractors, vehicles on which power shovels are mounted, such other construction equipment customarily used only on the site of construction and which is not practical for the transportation of persons or property upon the highways, such vehicles as travel exclusively upon rails, and such vehicles as are propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires while being operated within any municipality or where said vehicles do not travel more than five (5) miles beyond the city limit of any municipality.

As used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, “vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, except electric low-speed scooters, devices moved by human and animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or which derives its power from overhead wires;

KRS

186.020

to

186.270

apply to motor vehicle licenses. KRS

186.400

to

186.640

apply to operator’s licenses;

“Dealer” means any person engaging in the business of buying or selling motor vehicles;

“Commercial vehicles” means all motor vehicles that are required to be registered under the terms of KRS

186.050

, but not including vehicles primarily designed for carrying passengers and having provisions for not more than nine (9) passengers (including driver), motorcycles, sidecar attachments, pickup trucks and passenger vans which are not being used for commercial or business purposes, and motor vehicles registered under KRS

186.060

;

“Resident” means any person who has established Kentucky as his or her state of domicile. Proof of residency shall include but not be limited to a deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement. The possession by an operator of a vehicle of a valid Kentucky operator’s license shall be prima-facie evidence that the operator is a resident of Kentucky;

“Special status individual” means:

“Asylee” means any person lawfully present in the United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states “asylum status granted indefinitely pursuant to Section 208 of the Immigration & Nationality Act”;

“K-1 status” means the status of any person lawfully present in the United States who has been granted permission by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service to enter the United States for the purpose of marrying a United States citizen within ninety (90) days from the date of that entry;

“Refugee” means any person lawfully present in the United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states “admitted as a refugee pursuant to Section 207 of the Immigration & Nationality Act”; and

“Paroled in the Public Interest” means any person lawfully present in the United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states “paroled pursuant to Section 212 of the Immigration & Nationality Act for an indefinite period of time”;

“Instruction permit” includes both motor vehicle instruction permits and motorcycle instruction permits;

“Motorcycle” means any motor driven vehicle that has a maximum speed that exceeds fifty (50) miles per hour, has a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, and is designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, including vehicles on which the operator and passengers ride in an enclosed cab. Only for purposes of registration, “motorcycle” shall include a motor scooter, an alternative-speed motorcycle, and an autocycle as defined in this section, but shall not include a tractor or a moped as defined in this section;

“Low-speed vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:

Is self-propelled using an electric motor, combustion-driven motor, or a combination thereof;

Is four (4) wheeled; and

Is designed to operate at a speed not to exceed twenty-five (25) miles per hour as certified by the manufacturer;

“Alternative-speed motorcycle” means a motorcycle that:

Is self-propelled using an electric motor;

Is three (3) wheeled;

Has a fully enclosed cab and includes at least one (1) door for entry;

Is designed to operate at a speed not to exceed forty (40) miles per hour as certified by the manufacturer; and

Is not an autocycle as defined in this section;

“Multiple-vehicle driving range” means an enclosed area that is not part of a highway or otherwise open to the public on which a number of motor vehicles may be used simultaneously to provide driver training under the supervision of one (1) or more driver training instructors;

“Autocycle” means any motor vehicle that:

Is equipped with a seat that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride it;

Is designed to travel on three (3) wheels in contact with the ground;

Is designed to operate at a speed that exceeds forty (40) miles per hour as certified by the manufacturer;

Allows the operator and passenger to ride either side-by-side or in tandem in a seating area that may be enclosed with a removable or fixed top;

Is equipped with a three (3) point safety belt system;

May be equipped with a manufacturer-installed air bags or a roll cage;

Is designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals; and

Is not an alternative-speed motorcycle as defined in this section;

“Military surplus vehicle” means a multipurpose wheeled surplus military vehicle that:

Is not operated using continuous tracks;

Was originally manufactured for and sold directly to the Armed Forces of the United States; and

Was originally manufactured under the federally mandated requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.7;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

“Identity document” means an instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card issued under KRS

186.4102

,

186.412

,

186.412

1,

186.4122

, and

186.4123

or a commercial driver’s license issued under KRS Chapter 281A;

“Travel ID,” as it refers to an identity document, means a document that complies with Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II;

“Motor scooter” means a low-speed motorcycle that is:

Equipped with wheels greater than sixteen (16) inches in diameter;

Equipped with an engine greater than fifty (50) cubic centimeters;

Designed to operate at a speed not to exceed fifty (50) miles per hour;

Equipped with brake horsepower of two (2) or greater; and

Equipped with a step-through frame or a platform for the operator’s feet; and

“Alternative technology,” as used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, means methods used by the cabinet to facilitate the issuance of operator’s licenses and personal identification cards outside of the normal in-person application at a cabinet office, including but not limited to a cabinet mobile unit or online services.

HISTORY:

2739g-1, 2739m-33: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, § 1; 1950, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 10; 1962, ch. 62, § 1; 1966, ch. 139, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IX, § 20(2), (7), (9); 1978, ch. 349, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 194, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 431, § 7, effective January 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 287, § 1, effective January 1, 1989; 1994, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2001, ch. 43, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 264, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 103, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 16, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 55, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 69, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 129, § 8, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 184, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 100, § 35, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 22, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 26, effective March 27, 2020.

186.010.
Definitions for chapter. [Effective January 1, 2024]

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise indicated:

“Cabinet,” as used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, means the Transportation Cabinet; except as specifically designated, “cabinet,” as used in KRS

186.020

to

186.270

, means the Transportation Cabinet only with respect to motor vehicles, other than commercial vehicles; “cabinet,” as used in KRS

186.020

to

186.270

, means the Department of Vehicle Regulation when used with respect to commercial vehicles;

“Highway” means every way or place of whatever nature when any part of it is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, license, or privilege, for the purpose of vehicular traffic;

“Manufacturer” means any person engaged in manufacturing motor vehicles who will, under normal conditions during the year, manufacture or assemble at least ten (10) new motor vehicles;

“Motor vehicle” means in KRS

186.020

to

186.260

, all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (a) of subsection (8) of this section, which are propelled otherwise than by muscular power. As used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, it means all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of this section, which are self-propelled. “Motor vehicle” shall not include a moped as defined in this section, but for registration purposes shall include low-speed vehicles and military surplus vehicles as defined in this section and vehicles operating under KRS

189.283

;

“Moped” means either a motorized bicycle whose frame design may include one (1) or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank so long as it also has pedals, or a motorized bicycle with a step-through type frame which may or may not have pedals rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;

“Operator” means any person in actual control of a motor vehicle upon a highway;

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or a person who pursuant to a bona fide sale has received physical possession of the vehicle subject to any applicable security interest.

A vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease, with the vendee or lessee entitled to possession of the vehicle, upon performance of the contract terms, for a period of three hundred sixty-five (365) days or more and with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or if a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, the conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner.

A licensed motor vehicle dealer who transfers physical possession of a motor vehicle to a purchaser pursuant to a bona fide sale, and complies with the requirements of KRS

186A.220

, shall not be deemed the owner of that motor vehicle solely due to an assignment to his dealership or a certificate of title in the dealership’s name. Rather, under these circumstances, ownership shall transfer upon delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser, subject to any applicable security interest;

“Vehicle,” as used in KRS

186.020

to

186.260

, includes all agencies for the transportation of persons or property over or upon the public highways of this Commonwealth and all vehicles passing over or upon said highways, except electric low-speed scooters, road rollers, road graders, farm tractors, vehicles on which power shovels are mounted, such other construction equipment customarily used only on the site of construction and which is not practical for the transportation of persons or property upon the highways, such vehicles as travel exclusively upon rails, and such vehicles as are propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires while being operated within any municipality or where said vehicles do not travel more than five (5) miles beyond the city limit of any municipality.

As used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, “vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, except electric low-speed scooters, devices moved by human and animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or which derives its power from overhead wires;

KRS

186.020

to

186.270

apply to motor vehicle licenses. KRS

186.400

to

186.640

apply to operator’s licenses;

“Dealer” means any person engaging in the business of buying or selling motor vehicles;

“Commercial vehicles” means all motor vehicles that are required to be registered under the terms of KRS

186.050

, but not including vehicles primarily designed for carrying passengers and having provisions for not more than nine (9) passengers (including driver), motorcycles, sidecar attachments, pickup trucks and passenger vans which are not being used for commercial or business purposes, and motor vehicles registered under KRS

186.060

;

“Resident” means any person who has established Kentucky as his or her state of domicile. Proof of residency shall include but not be limited to a deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement. The possession by an operator of a vehicle of a valid Kentucky operator’s license shall be prima-facie evidence that the operator is a resident of Kentucky;

“Special status individual” means:

“Asylee” means any person lawfully present in the United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states “asylum status granted indefinitely pursuant to Section 208 of the Immigration & Nationality Act”;

“K-1 status” means the status of any person lawfully present in the United States who has been granted permission by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service to enter the United States for the purpose of marrying a United States citizen within ninety (90) days from the date of that entry;

“Refugee” means any person lawfully present in the United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states “admitted as a refugee pursuant to Section 207 of the Immigration & Nationality Act”; and

“Paroled in the Public Interest” means any person lawfully present in the United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states “paroled pursuant to Section 212 of the Immigration & Nationality Act for an indefinite period of time”;

“Instruction permit” includes both motor vehicle instruction permits and motorcycle instruction permits;

“Motorcycle” means any motor driven vehicle that has a maximum speed that exceeds fifty (50) miles per hour, has a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, and is designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, including vehicles on which the operator and passengers ride in an enclosed cab. Only for purposes of registration, “motorcycle” shall include a motor scooter, an alternative-speed motorcycle, and an autocycle as defined in this section, but shall not include a tractor or a moped as defined in this section;

“Low-speed vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:

Is self-propelled using an electric motor, combustion-driven motor, or a combination thereof;

Is four (4) wheeled; and

Is designed to operate at a speed not to exceed twenty-five (25) miles per hour as certified by the manufacturer;

“Alternative-speed motorcycle” means a motorcycle that:

Is self-propelled using an electric motor;

Is three (3) wheeled;

Has a fully enclosed cab and includes at least one (1) door for entry;

Is designed to operate at a speed not to exceed forty (40) miles per hour as certified by the manufacturer; and

Is not an autocycle as defined in this section;

“Multiple-vehicle driving range” means an enclosed area that is not part of a highway or otherwise open to the public on which a number of motor vehicles may be used simultaneously to provide driver training under the supervision of one (1) or more driver training instructors;

“Autocycle” means any motor vehicle that:

Is equipped with a seat that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride it;

Is designed to travel on three (3) wheels in contact with the ground;

Is designed to operate at a speed that exceeds forty (40) miles per hour as certified by the manufacturer;

Allows the operator and passenger to ride either side-by-side or in tandem in a seating area that may be enclosed with a removable or fixed top;

Is equipped with a three (3) point safety belt system;

May be equipped with a manufacturer-installed air bags or a roll cage;

Is designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals; and

Is not an alternative-speed motorcycle as defined in this section;

“Military surplus vehicle” means a multipurpose wheeled surplus military vehicle that:

Is not operated using continuous tracks;

Was originally manufactured for and sold directly to the Armed Forces of the United States; and

Was originally manufactured under the federally mandated requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.7;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

“Identity document” means an instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card issued under KRS

186.4102

,

186.412

,

186.412

1,

186.4122

, and

186.4123

or a commercial driver’s license issued under KRS Chapter 281A;

“Travel ID,” as it refers to an identity document, means a document that complies with Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II;

“Motor scooter” means a low-speed motorcycle that is:

Equipped with wheels greater than sixteen (16) inches in diameter;

Equipped with an engine greater than fifty (50) cubic centimeters;

Designed to operate at a speed not to exceed fifty (50) miles per hour;

Equipped with brake horsepower of two (2) or greater; and

Equipped with a step-through frame or a platform for the operator’s feet;

“Alternative technology,” as used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, means methods used by the cabinet to facilitate the issuance of operator’s licenses and personal identification cards outside of the normal in-person application at a cabinet office, including but not limited to a cabinet mobile unit or online services;

“Electric motorcycle” means the same as “motorcycle” or “motor scooter” as defined in this section, that is powered by a:

Battery or equivalent energy storage device that can be charged with an electric plug using an external electricity source; or

Combination of an internal combustion engine and electric motor;

“Electric vehicle” means any vehicle that has plug-in charging capability, regardless of whether the vehicle is powered by:

An electric motor only; or

A combination of an internal combustion engine and electric power; and

“Hybrid vehicle” means any vehicle that does not have plug-in charging capability and is powered by a combination of an internal combustion engine and an electric motor.

HISTORY:

2739g-1, 2739m-33: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, § 1; 1950, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 10; 1962, ch. 62, § 1; 1966, ch. 139, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IX, § 20(2), (7), (9); 1978, ch. 349, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 194, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 431, § 7, effective January 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 287, § 1, effective January 1, 1989; 1994, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2001, ch. 43, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 264, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 103, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 16, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 55, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 69, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 129, § 8, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 184, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 100, § 35, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 22, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 26, effective March 27, 2020; 2022 ch. 212, § 30, effective January 1, 2024.

186.014.
Branch offices for issuance of licenses.

In any county, the county clerk and the circuit clerk may maintain branch offices in each legislative district for the purpose of issuing motor vehicle registration plates and drivers’ licenses. These offices may be located in volunteer fire department stations or in other buildings used for a public purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 55, § 2.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the legislature intended that legislative district should mean state representative district, this section permits the county clerk of Knott County to establish one branch office in the county for the purpose of issuing license plates during the vehicle license period, but would not empower him to take license plates into each voting precinct for that purpose. The one branch office could be located at the voting place in a precinct provided that the voting place is a building used for a public purpose.

OAG 73-435

.

Except in the case of counties of less than 150,000 population containing a city of the second class, this section is the only authority under which a county court clerk may establish a branch office outside of the county seat.

OAG 73-545

.

A branch office for the issuance of drivers’ licenses may not be located in a shopping center unless it is located in a building used for a public purpose as required by this section.

OAG 75-346

.

The intent of this section was to provide that the county clerk or the circuit clerk may maintain two or more branch offices, as needed in each state representative district in the county, since the conjunctive word “and” may be construed in the disjunctive when necessary to effectuate the obvious intention of the legislature.

OAG 82-43

(modifying

OAG 73-435

).

Population density and convenience to motor vehicle owners in licensing motor vehicles were at the forefront of legislative intent in enacting this section; accordingly, the county clerk, depending upon the need for same under the above contextual criteria, may maintain two or more branch offices in each legislative district.

OAG 82-43

(modifying

OAG 73-435

).

This section narrowly relates to only the issuance of motor vehicle license plates, as concerns the county clerk, while subsection (1) of KRS

67.035

is designed to accommodate any other function of the county clerk in the county; accordingly, assuming that Pike County has a land area of more than 750 square miles, the fiscal court of Pike County may authorize the county clerk to maintain a branch office in any incorporated (other than in Pikeville) or unincorporated city of Pike County but only on a reasonable showing of the necessity for such branches.

OAG 82-43

.

186.015.
License plates and operators’ licenses for residents of Fort Knox. [Repealed.]

186.016.
Cabinet may prescribe methods of record keeping.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the cabinet may by regulation prescribe methods of record keeping and reporting by the county clerk to the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 133, § 19; 1978, ch. 384, § 329, effective June 17, 1978.

186.018.
Driving history records of operators — Fees.

For purposes of maintaining driving history records of operators of motor vehicles of the Commonwealth, the files of the Transportation Cabinet shall be used to ascertain the driving history record of each person who is licensed to operate a motor vehicle within the Commonwealth. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall destroy, and shall not maintain, records of moving traffic convictions that are more than five (5) years old. Notwithstanding, for any licensee who now holds, who has applied for, or has ever held a Class A, B, or C license issued pursuant to KRS

281A.170

, the cabinet shall keep conviction records indefinitely.

The Transportation Cabinet shall not release information on the driving history record of a person under the age of twenty-one (21) whose operator license has been suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.010(6). The cabinet shall destroy, and shall not maintain, the record of the suspension of a person’s operator’s license if the license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.010(6), within five (5) working days of the person’s operator’s license being reinstated. This subsection shall not apply to a person who holds, or is required to hold, a commercial driver’s license.

The cabinet shall charge a fee of three dollars ($3) for any driving history record, ten cents ($0.10) of which shall be deposited in a special account within the road fund to be used exclusively by the Transportation Cabinet for the state driver education program as designated in KRS

186.535

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 434, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 455, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 274, § 9, effective April 7, 1992; 1996, ch. 198, § 11, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, § 20, effective October 1, 2000; 2005, ch. 165, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.